Ohio, session 136, HB791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.455 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.455. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of state route number nineteen, running in a northerly and southerly direction, between the intersection of that route and Linden drive and the intersection of that route and Beck road, within Crawford county, shall be known as the "Patrolman Robert E. Karsmizki Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.